Illinois, session 104th, SB105.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Open Meetings Act is amended by changing 5Sections 1.02, 2, and 2.02 and by adding Section 2.07 as 6follows: 7    (5 ILCS 120/1.02)  (from Ch. 102, par. 41.02)8    Sec. 1.02. For the purposes of this Act: 9    "Meeting" means any gathering, whether in person or by 10video or audio conference, telephone call, electronic means 11(such as, without limitation, electronic mail, electronic 12chat, and instant messaging), or other means of 13contemporaneous interactive communication, of a majority of a 14quorum of the members of a public body held for the purpose of 15discussing public business or, for a 5-member public body, a 16quorum of the members of a public body held for the purpose of 17discussing public business.18    Accordingly, for a 5-member public body, 3 members of the 19body constitute a quorum and the affirmative vote of 3 members 20is necessary to adopt any motion, resolution, or ordinance, 21unless a greater number is otherwise required. For a 3-member 22body, 2 members of the body constitute a quorum and the 23affirmative vote of 2 members is necessary to adopt any   SB0105- 2 -LRB104 06549 BDA 16585 b1motion, resolution, or ordinance, unless a greater number is 2otherwise provided. 3    "Public body" includes all legislative, executive, 4administrative or advisory bodies of the State, counties, 5townships, cities, villages, incorporated towns, school 6districts and all other municipal corporations, boards, 7bureaus, committees or commissions of this State, and any 8subsidiary bodies of any of the foregoing including but not 9limited to committees and subcommittees which are supported in 10whole or in part by tax revenue, or which expend tax revenue, 11except the General Assembly and committees or commissions 12thereof. "Public body" includes tourism boards and convention 13or civic center boards located in counties that are contiguous 14to the Mississippi River with populations of more than 250,000 15but less than 300,000. "Public body" includes the Health 16Facilities and Services Review Board. "Public body" does not 17include a child death review team or the Illinois Child Death 18Review Teams Executive Council established under the Child 19Death Review Team Act, an ethics commission acting under the 20State Officials and Employees Ethics Act, a regional youth 21advisory board or the Statewide Youth Advisory Board 22established under the Department of Children and Family 23Services Statewide Youth Advisory Board Act, the Illinois 24Independent Tax Tribunal, or the regional interagency fatality 25review teams and the Illinois Fatality Review Team Advisory 26Council established under the Adult Protective Services Act.   SB0105- 3 -LRB104 06549 BDA 16585 b1(Source: P.A. 103-626, eff. 1-1-25.) 2    (5 ILCS 120/2)  (from Ch. 102, par. 42)3    Sec. 2. Open meetings. 4    (a) Openness required. All meetings of public bodies shall 5be open to the public unless excepted in subsection (c) and 6closed in accordance with Section 2a.7    (b) Construction of exceptions. The exceptions contained 8in subsection (c) are in derogation of the requirement that 9public bodies meet in the open, and therefore, the exceptions 10are to be strictly construed, extending only to subjects 11clearly within their scope. The exceptions authorize but do 12not require the holding of a closed meeting to discuss a 13subject included within an enumerated exception.14    (c) Exceptions. A public body may hold closed meetings to 15consider the following subjects:16        (1) The appointment, employment, compensation, 17    discipline, performance, or dismissal of specific 18    employees, specific individuals who serve as independent 19    contractors in a park, recreational, or educational 20    setting, or specific volunteers of the public body or 21    legal counsel for the public body, including hearing 22    testimony on a complaint lodged against an employee, a 23    specific individual who serves as an independent 24    contractor in a park, recreational, or educational 25    setting, or a volunteer of the public body or against   SB0105- 4 -LRB104 06549 BDA 16585 b1    legal counsel for the public body to determine its 2    validity. However, a meeting to consider an increase in 3    compensation to a specific employee of a public body that 4    is subject to the Local Government Wage Increase 5    Transparency Act may not be closed and shall be open to the 6    public and posted and held in accordance with this Act.7        (2) Collective negotiating matters between the public 8    body and its employees or their representatives, or 9    deliberations concerning salary schedules for one or more 10    classes of employees.11        (3) The selection of a person to fill a public office, 12    as defined in this Act, including a vacancy in a public 13    office, when the public body is given power to appoint 14    under law or ordinance, or the discipline, performance or 15    removal of the occupant of a public office, when the 16    public body is given power to remove the occupant under 17    law or ordinance. 18        (4) Evidence or testimony presented in open hearing, 19    or in closed hearing where specifically authorized by law, 20    to a quasi-adjudicative body, as defined in this Act, 21    provided that the body prepares and makes available for 22    public inspection a written decision setting forth its 23    determinative reasoning.24        (4.5) Evidence or testimony presented to a school 25    board regarding denial of admission to school events or 26    property pursuant to Section 24-24 of the School Code,   SB0105- 5 -LRB104 06549 BDA 16585 b1    provided that the school board prepares and makes 2    available for public inspection a written decision setting 3    forth its determinative reasoning. 4        (4.7) A meeting held by a Police District Council, 5    created under Section 2-80-070 of the Municipal Code of 6    Chicago, in which an issue of public safety concerns: (i) 7    an ongoing, prior, or future law enforcement or official 8    misconduct investigation, or allegation thereof, involving 9    specific individuals; or (ii) other topics that if 10    discussed in an open meeting would pose an unreasonable 11    risk to an ongoing criminal investigation or an 12    unreasonable risk to the safety of specific individuals. 13        (5) The purchase or lease of real property for the use 14    of the public body, including meetings held for the 15    purpose of discussing whether a particular parcel should 16    be acquired.17        (6) The setting of a price for sale or lease of 18    property owned by the public body.19        (7) The sale or purchase of securities, investments, 20    or investment contracts. This exception shall not apply to 21    the investment of assets or income of funds deposited into 22    the Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund. 23        (8) Security procedures, school building safety and 24    security, and the use of personnel and equipment to 25    respond to an actual, a threatened, or a reasonably 26    potential danger to the safety of employees, students,   SB0105- 6 -LRB104 06549 BDA 16585 b1    staff, the public, or public property.2        (9) Student disciplinary cases.3        (10) The placement of individual students in special 4    education programs and other matters relating to 5    individual students.6        (11) Litigation, when an action against, affecting or 7    on behalf of the particular public body has been filed and 8    is pending before a court or administrative tribunal, or 9    when the public body finds that an action is probable or 10    imminent, in which case the basis for the finding shall be 11    recorded and entered into the minutes of the closed 12    meeting.13        (12) The establishment of reserves or settlement of 14    claims as provided in the Local Governmental and 15    Governmental Employees Tort Immunity Act, if otherwise the 16    disposition of a claim or potential claim might be 17    prejudiced, or the review or discussion of claims, loss or 18    risk management information, records, data, advice or 19    communications from or with respect to any insurer of the 20    public body or any intergovernmental risk management 21    association or self insurance pool of which the public 22    body is a member.23        (13) Conciliation of complaints of discrimination in 24    the sale or rental of housing, when closed meetings are 25    authorized by the law or ordinance prescribing fair 26    housing practices and creating a commission or   SB0105- 7 -LRB104 06549 BDA 16585 b1    administrative agency for their enforcement.2        (14) Informant sources, the hiring or assignment of 3    undercover personnel or equipment, or ongoing, prior or 4    future criminal investigations, when discussed by a public 5    body with criminal investigatory responsibilities.6        (15) Professional ethics or performance when 7    considered by an advisory body appointed to advise a 8    licensing or regulatory agency on matters germane to the 9    advisory body's field of competence.10        (16) Self evaluation, practices and procedures or 11    professional ethics, when meeting with a representative of 12    a statewide association of which the public body is a 13    member.14        (17) The recruitment, credentialing, discipline or 15    formal peer review of physicians or other health care 16    professionals, or for the discussion of matters protected 17    under the federal Patient Safety and Quality Improvement 18    Act of 2005, and the regulations promulgated thereunder, 19    including 42 C.F.R. Part 3 (73 FR 70732), or the federal 20    Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 21    1996, and the regulations promulgated thereunder, 22    including 45 C.F.R. Parts 160, 162, and 164, by a 23    hospital, or other institution providing medical care, 24    that is operated by the public body.25        (18) Deliberations for decisions of the Prisoner 26    Review Board.  SB0105- 8 -LRB104 06549 BDA 16585 b1        (19) Review or discussion of applications received 2    under the Experimental Organ Transplantation Procedures 3    Act.4        (20) The classification and discussion of matters 5    classified as confidential or continued confidential by 6    the State Government Suggestion Award Board.7        (21) Discussion of minutes of meetings lawfully closed 8    under this Act, whether for purposes of approval by the 9    body of the minutes or semi-annual review of the minutes 10    as mandated by Section 2.06.11        (22) Deliberations for decisions of the State 12    Emergency Medical Services Disciplinary Review Board.13        (23) The operation by a municipality of a municipal 14    utility or the operation of a municipal power agency or 15    municipal natural gas agency when the discussion involves 16    (i) contracts relating to the purchase, sale, or delivery 17    of electricity or natural gas or (ii) the results or 18    conclusions of load forecast studies.19        (24) Meetings of a residential health care facility 20    resident sexual assault and death review team or the 21    Executive Council under the Abuse Prevention Review Team 22    Act.23        (25) Meetings of an independent team of experts under 24    Brian's Law. 25        (26) Meetings of a mortality review team appointed 26    under the Department of Juvenile Justice Mortality Review   SB0105- 9 -LRB104 06549 BDA 16585 b1    Team Act. 2        (27) (Blank). 3        (28) Correspondence and records (i) that may not be 4    disclosed under Section 11-9 of the Illinois Public Aid 5    Code or (ii) that pertain to appeals under Section 11-8 of 6    the Illinois Public Aid Code. 7        (29) Meetings between internal or external auditors 8    and governmental audit committees, finance committees, and 9    their equivalents, when the discussion involves internal 10    control weaknesses, identification of potential fraud risk 11    areas, known or suspected frauds, and fraud interviews 12    conducted in accordance with generally accepted auditing 13    standards of the United States of America.14        (30) (Blank). 15        (31) Meetings and deliberations for decisions of the 16    Concealed Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm 17    Concealed Carry Act. 18        (32) Meetings between the Regional Transportation 19    Authority Board and its Service Boards when the discussion 20    involves review by the Regional Transportation Authority 21    Board of employment contracts under Section 28d of the 22    Metropolitan Transit Authority Act and Sections 3A.18 and 23    3B.26 of the Regional Transportation Authority Act.24        (33) Those meetings or portions of meetings of the 25    advisory committee and peer review subcommittee created 26    under Section 320 of the Illinois Controlled Substances   SB0105- 10 -LRB104 06549 BDA 16585 b1    Act during which specific controlled substance prescriber, 2    dispenser, or patient information is discussed.3        (34) Meetings of the Tax Increment Financing Reform 4    Task Force under Section 2505-800 of the Department of 5    Revenue Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 6        (35) Meetings of the group established to discuss 7    Medicaid capitation rates under Section 5-30.8 of the 8    Illinois Public Aid Code. 9        (36) Those deliberations or portions of deliberations 10    for decisions of the Illinois Gaming Board in which there 11    is discussed any of the following: (i) personal, 12    commercial, financial, or other information obtained from 13    any source that is privileged, proprietary, confidential, 14    or a trade secret; or (ii) information specifically 15    exempted from the disclosure by federal or State law.16        (37) Deliberations for decisions of the Illinois Law 17    Enforcement Training Standards Board, the Certification 18    Review Panel, and the Illinois State Police Merit Board 19    regarding certification and decertification. 20        (38) Meetings of the Ad Hoc Statewide Domestic 21    Violence Fatality Review Committee of the Illinois 22    Criminal Justice Information Authority Board that occur in 23    closed executive session under subsection (d) of Section 24    35 of the Domestic Violence Fatality Review Act. 25        (39) Meetings of the regional review teams under 26    subsection (a) of Section 75 of the Domestic Violence   SB0105- 11 -LRB104 06549 BDA 16585 b1    Fatality Review Act. 2        (40) Meetings of the Firearm Owner's Identification 3    Card Review Board under Section 10 of the Firearm Owners 4    Identification Card Act. 5    (d) Definitions. For purposes of this Section:6    "Employee" means a person employed by a public body whose 7relationship with the public body constitutes an 8employer-employee relationship under the usual common law 9rules, and who is not an independent contractor.10    "Public office" means a position created by or under the 11Constitution or laws of this State, the occupant of which is 12charged with the exercise of some portion of the sovereign 13power of this State. The term "public office" shall include 14members of the public body, but it shall not include 15organizational positions filled by members thereof, whether 16established by law or by a public body itself, that exist to 17assist the body in the conduct of its business.18    "Quasi-adjudicative body" means an administrative body 19charged by law or ordinance with the responsibility to conduct 20hearings, receive evidence or testimony and make 21determinations based thereon, but does not include local 22electoral boards when such bodies are considering petition 23challenges.24    (e) Final action. No final action may be taken at a closed 25meeting. Final action shall be preceded by a public recital of 26the nature of the matter being considered and other   SB0105- 12 -LRB104 06549 BDA 16585 b1information that will inform the public of the business being 2conducted. 3(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-520, eff. 8-20-21; 4102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-311, eff. 57-28-23; 103-626, eff. 1-1-25.) 6    (5 ILCS 120/2.02)  (from Ch. 102, par. 42.02)7    Sec. 2.02. Public notice of all meetings, whether open or 8closed to the public, shall be given as follows:9    (a) Every public body shall give public notice of the 10schedule of regular meetings at the beginning of each calendar 11or fiscal year and shall state the regular dates, times, and 12places of such meetings. An agenda for each regular meeting 13shall be posted at the principal office of the public body, if 14such an office exists, and at the location where the meeting is 15to be held at least 48 hours in advance of the holding of the 16meeting. A public body that has a website that the full-time 17staff of the public body maintains shall also post on its 18website the agenda of any regular meetings of the governing 19body of that public body. Any agenda of a regular meeting that 20is posted on a public body's website shall remain posted on the 21website until the regular meeting is concluded. The 22requirement of a regular meeting agenda shall not preclude the 23consideration of items not specifically set forth in the 24agenda. Public notice of any special meeting except a meeting 25held in the event of a bona fide emergency, or of any   SB0105- 13 -LRB104 06549 BDA 16585 b1rescheduled regular meeting, or of any reconvened meeting, 2shall be given at least 48 hours before such meeting, which 3notice shall also include the agenda for the special, 4rescheduled, or reconvened meeting, but the validity of any 5action taken by the public body which is germane to a subject 6on the agenda shall not be affected by other errors or 7omissions in the agenda. The requirement of public notice of 8reconvened meetings does not apply to any case where the 9meeting was open to the public and (1) it is to be reconvened 10within 24 hours, or (2) an announcement of the time and place 11of the reconvened meeting was made at the original meeting and 12there is no change in the agenda. Notice of an emergency 13meeting shall be given as soon as practicable, but in any event 14prior to the holding of such meeting, to any news medium which 15has filed an annual request for notice under subsection (b) of 16this Section.17    (b) Public notice shall be given by posting a copy of the 18notice at the principal office of the body holding the meeting 19or, if no such office exists, at the building in which the 20meeting is to be held. In addition, a public body that has a 21website that the full-time staff of the public body maintains 22shall post notice on its website of all meetings of the 23governing body of the public body. If a public body has a 24website that is maintained by its full-time staff but does not 25have a principal office or single building where meetings are 26regularly held, that body shall be deemed to have complied   SB0105- 14 -LRB104 06549 BDA 16585 b1with the requirement to post physical notice at the office or 2building of the meeting if the notice is timely posted on that 3public body's website. The public body must comply with all 4other notice requirements set forth in this Act. Any notice of 5an annual schedule of meetings shall remain on the website 6until a new public notice of the schedule of regular meetings 7is approved. Any notice of a regular meeting that is posted on 8a public body's website shall remain posted on the website 9until the regular meeting is concluded. The body shall supply 10copies of the notice of its regular meetings, and of the notice 11of any special, emergency, rescheduled or reconvened meeting, 12to any news medium that has filed an annual request for such 13notice. Any such news medium shall also be given the same 14notice of all special, emergency, rescheduled or reconvened 15meetings in the same manner as is given to members of the body 16provided such news medium has given the public body an address 17or telephone number within the territorial jurisdiction of the 18public body at which such notice may be given. The failure of a 19public body to post on its website notice of any meeting or the 20agenda of any meeting shall not invalidate any meeting or any 21actions taken at a meeting. 22    (c) Any agenda required under this Section shall set forth 23the general subject matter of any resolution or ordinance that 24will be the subject of final action at the meeting. The public 25body conducting a public meeting shall ensure that at least 26one copy of any requested notice and agenda for the meeting is   SB0105- 15 -LRB104 06549 BDA 16585 b1continuously available for public review during the entire 248-hour period preceding the meeting. Posting of the notice 3and agenda on a website that is maintained by the public body 4satisfies the requirement for continuous posting under this 5subsection (c). If a notice or agenda is not continuously 6available for the full 48-hour period due to actions outside 7of the control of the public body, then that lack of 8availability does not invalidate any meeting or action taken 9at a meeting. 10(Source: P.A. 97-827, eff. 1-1-13.) 11    (5 ILCS 120/2.07 new)12    Sec. 2.07. Police District Councils.13    (a) For a Police District Council created under Section 142-80-070 of the Municipal Code of Chicago, "meeting" does not 15include a gathering of 2 members of the public body, except 16when gathered for a regularly scheduled meeting or otherwise 17gathered to adopt any motion, resolution, or ordinance.18    (b) With the exception of the required regularly scheduled 19monthly meetings, Police District Councils created under 20Section 2-80-070 of the Municipal Code of Chicago may hold 21meetings by audio or video conference, without the physical 22presence of the members, subject to the following conditions:23        (1) All Police District Council members participating 24    in the meeting, wherever their physical location, shall be 25    verified and can hear one another and can hear all   SB0105- 16 -LRB104 06549 BDA 16585 b1    discussion and testimony.2        (2) Any members of the public attending the meeting 3    can hear all Police District Council members and all 4    discussion, testimony, and roll-call votes.5        (3) Notice of the remote meeting, including how to 6    contemporaneously hear all discussion, testimony, and 7    roll-call votes, whether by telephone number or web-based 8    link, is provided to the public at least 48 hours prior to 9    the meeting, except in the case of a bona fide emergency.10        (4) All votes are conducted by roll call, so each 11    member's vote on each issue can be identified and 12    recorded.13        (5) A verbatim record is kept in the form of an audio 14    or video recording and made available to the public not 15    more than 48 hours before the conclusion of the meeting.